Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1112.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2803 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 2803. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Electromechanical analog meter." A meter attached by a public utility to the wiring of a customer's building or residence for the purpose of measuring the amount of electricity consumed by the customer or to supply pipes for the purpose of 123456789101112131415161718 measuring the amount of natural gas or water consumed by the customer that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The m eter has no wireless or power line data transmission capabilities. (2) The meter has no wireless or power line reception capabilities.(3) The meter c ontains no switched-mode power supply. (4) If the meter is attached to the wiring of a customer's building or residence, the meter contains surge protection.* * *"Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program." A federally funded program that provides financial assistance in the form of cash and crisis grants to low-income households for home energy bills and is administered by the Department of Human Services . "Natural gas distribution service." As defined in section 2202 (relating to definitions)."Natural gas distribution utility." A city natural gas distribution operation or entity that provides natural gas distribution services and may provide natural gas supply services and other services. The term does not include either of the following:(1) A public utility providing natural gas distribution services subject to the jurisdiction of the c ommission that has annual gas operating revenues of less than $6,000,000 per year, except where the public utility voluntarily petitions the commission to be included within this definition or where the public utility seeks to provide natural gas supply services to retail gas customers outside its service territory.20250HB1112PN1234 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A public utility providing natural gas distribution services subject to the jurisdiction of the commission that is not connected to an interstate gas pipeline by means of a direct connection or an indirect connection through the distribution system of another natural gas public utility or through a natural gas gathering system."Natural gas supply services." As defined in section 2202.* * *"Water distribution utility." An entity owning or operating equipment or facilities for diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing or furnishing water to or for the public for compensation.Section 2. Section 2807(f)(2) of Title 66 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *(f) Smart meter technology and time of use rates.--* * *(2) [Electric] Except as provided under subsection (f.1), electric distribution companies shall furnish smart meter technology as follows:(i) Upon request from a customer that agrees to pay the cost of the smart meter at the time of the request.(ii) In new building construction.(iii) In accordance with a depreciation schedule not to exceed 15 years.* * *(f.1) Electromechanical analog meters.-- Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (f), a customer may elect to have an electromechanical analog meter for use on the customer's 20250HB1112PN1234 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property instead of a smart meter at any time with all consequent actual costs to be recovered from the customer as approved by the commission. The following shall apply:(1) A customer may select an electromechanical analog meter by providing a notice to the electric distribution company of the customer's selection. Upon request by the customer, the electric distribution company shall provide a form for the customer to make a selection under this subsection by certified mail or electronically through the electric distribution company' s publicly accessible Internet website.(2) I f an electric distribution company has previously installed smart meter technology on a customer's property, the electric distribution company may charge the customer for the installation of an electromechanical analog meter and the actual costs incurred to provide service through the electromechanical analog meter as approved by the commission on a full and current basis. The following apply to billing:(i) The cost of the installation must be amortized over the next 12 months of billing unless the customer chooses to pay early.(ii) Any monthly costs associated with the use of the electromechanical analog meter must be billed monthly.(3) An electric distribution company may not assess any other additional fees, monthly or otherwise, to a customer who has paid for the installation of an electromechanical analog meter under paragraph (2).(4) A customer who qualifies for a customer assistance program, the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program or 20250HB1112PN1234 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other assistance with financial hardship in accordance with a public utility's guidelines shall qualify for assistance in paying for the installation of an electromechanical analog meter under paragraph (2).(5) An electric distribution company shall complete the installation of an electromechanical analog meter within a reasonable time period, but no later than 60 days after the customer's request to switch to an electromechanical analog meter under paragraph (1).* * *Section 3. Title 66 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2807.1. Duties of public utilities. (a) Usage reporting.--A public utility shall provide a customer with easily accessible methods to report energy usage on a monthly basis, including by phone, certified mail and online reporting. (b) Meter switching.-- No less than once annually, a public utility shall inform a customer of the option to switch the customer's current meter to an electromechanical analog meter . (c) Natural gas distribution utilities.--A natural gas distribution utility shall provide a customer with the option of a usage-measuring meter that does not transmit or receive wirelessly in accordance with the same requirements applicable to an electromechanical analog meter under section 2807(f.1) (relating to duties of electric distribution companies) . (d) Water distribution utilities.--A water distribution utility s hall provide a customer with the option of a usage- measuring meter that does not transmit or receive wirelessly in accordance with the same requirements applicable to an electromechanical analog meter under section 2807(f.1) . 20250HB1112PN1234 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1112PN1234 - 6 - 1